Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.255

Electronic documents—Acceptance.

The secretary of state or a county auditor shall accept and file in his or her office electronic transmissions of the following documents:

(1) Declarations of candidacy;

(2) County canvass reports;

(3) Voters' pamphlet statements;

(4) Arguments for and against ballot measures that will appear in a voters' pamphlet;

(5) Requests for recounts;

(6) Certification of candidates and measures by the secretary of state;

(7) Direction by the secretary of state for the conduct of a recount;

(8) Requests for ballots;

(9) Any other election related document authorized by rule adopted by the secretary of state under RCW 29A.04.611.

The acceptance by the secretary of state or the county auditor is conditional upon the document being filed in a timely manner, being legible, and otherwise satisfying the requirements of state law or rules with respect to form and content.

The secretary may by rule require that the original of any document, a copy of which is filed by electronic transmission under this section, also be filed by a deadline established by the secretary by rule.

[ 2011 c 349 s 1; 2011 c 348 s 1; 2011 c 10 s 9; 2004 c 266 s 5; 2003 c 111 s 142; 1991 c 186 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.04.230.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2011 c 10 s 9, 2011 c 348 s 1, and by 2011 c 349 s 1, each without reference to the other. All amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective date—2011 c 349: "Except for sections 10 through 12, 21, 27, 28, and 30 of this act, this act takes effect January 1, 2012." [ 2011 c 349 s 33.]

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.